New York, session 2025-2026, A9582.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 190 of the labor law, as amended 2 by chapter 391 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 3 2. "Employee" means any person employed for hire by an employer in any 4 employment, but with respect to the entirety of this article, except 5 sections one hundred ninety-three, one hundred ninety-six-b, one hundred 6 ninety-eight, and one hundred ninety-eight-b, shall not include any 7 person who has entered into a contract to play baseball at the minor 8 league level and who is compensated pursuant to the terms of a collec- 9 tive bargaining agreement that expressly provides for the wages, hours 10 of work, and working conditions of employees. For the purposes of 11 section one hundred ninety-six-b of this article, "employee" shall 12 include a delivery network company worker, which shall mean an individ- 13 ual who has entered into an agreement with a delivery network company, 14 as defined in subdivision three of this section, to pick up and deliver 15 delivery network company orders for compensation. 16 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 190 of the labor law, as amended by 17 chapter 281 of the laws of 2002, is amended to read as follows: 18 3. "Employer" includes any person, corporation, limited liability 19 company, or association employing any individual in any occupation, 20 industry, trade, business or service. The term "employer" shall not 21 include a governmental agency. For the purposes of section one hundred 22 ninety-six-b of this article, the employer of a delivery network company 23 worker, as defined in subdivision two of this section, shall be a deliv- 24 ery network company, which shall mean a person, corporation, partner- 25 ship, sole proprietorship, or other entity that is operating in New York 26 state exclusively using a digital network to connect delivery network 27 company customers with delivery network company workers who provide 28 delivery for orders of products made via a digital network, but shall EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14087-01-5 A. 9582 2 1 not include (i) a transportation network company, as defined by section 2 sixteen hundred ninety-one of the vehicle and traffic law; or (ii) a 3 restaurant, or restaurant chain, that enables customers to place orders 4 for food using a digital network that was created specifically for use 5 by customers of such restaurant or restaurant chain. 6 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.